Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 8. Transportation.

§ 45.2-744.
Haulage roads.

The roadbed, rails, joints, switches, frogs, and other elements of the track of each haulage road shall be constructed, installed, and maintained in a manner that ensures the safe operation of the haulage road. In determining its safety, consideration shall be given to the speed of equipment and the type of haulage operations conducted on the haulage road.

Haulage tracks shall be kept free of accumulations of coal spillage and debris, and water shall not be allowed to accumulate over the top of the rail.

Every off-track haulage equipment operator shall observe the haulage road for hazardous conditions during the course of travel and shall promptly correct or report to the mine foreman any hazardous condition observed.

Each off-track haulage road shall be maintained reasonably free of bottom irregularities, excess spillage, debris, wet or muddy conditions that make controlling off-track haulage equipment difficult, and any accumulation of water over such an area of the haulage road and in such a depth as to allow water to enter an electrical panel and create a potentially hazardous condition.

No uninsulated trolley lines shall be used or installed in any underground coal mine without approval of the Chief.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-70; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.133; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2011, cc. 826, 862; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-745.
Track switches and rails.

Every track switch shall be provided with a properly installed throw and properly installed latches and bridle bars.

Every track switch, other than a switch in a room or entry development, shall be equipped with properly installed guardrails.

Every switch throw and stand shall be installed on the side of the track where clearance is provided.

Every rail shall be secured at all joints by plates or welds.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-69.1, 45-69.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-70, 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.134; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-746.
Clearance on haulage roads.

Every track haulage road in an entry, room, or crosscut shall have a continuous clearance on one side of at least two feet from the farthest projection of moving traffic. The clearance shall be kept free of any obstruction to a height permitted by the height of the coal seam. When it is not possible to maintain such clearance, signs indicating close clearance shall be posted inby and outby the affected area.

Every track haulage road in an entry, room, or crosscut shall have a continuous clearance on the side opposite the clearance required by subsection A of at least six inches from the farthest projection of moving traffic. When it is not possible to maintain such clearance, signs indicating close clearance shall be posted inby and outby the affected area.

Each track haulage road where trolley lines are used shall have the clearance required by subsection A on the side of the track opposite the trolley lines. This requirement shall not apply if the trolley lines are at least 6.5 feet above the rail.

The clearance space on each track haulage road shall be kept free of loose rock, loose coal, loose supplies, and other loose materials. If the clearance space exceeds two feet, at least two feet of the clearance space shall be kept free of such materials.

Every parallel track shall be installed so as to provide a clearance of at least two feet between the outermost projections of passing traffic.

Ample clearance shall be provided (i) at each conveyor loading head, (ii) at each conveyor control panel, and (iii) along each conveyor line.

Every belt conveyor shall be equipped with a control switch to automatically stop the driving motor in the event that the belt is stopped by slipping on the driving pulley as a result of breakage or other accident.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-14.1, 45-69.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-71, 45.1-89; 1974, c. 323; 1978, c. 118; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 500; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.135; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-747.
Conveyor crossings.

Suitable facilities for crossing a conveyor belt shall be provided where it is necessary for miners to cross such conveyor belt regularly.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-71; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.136; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-748.
Shelter holes.

Every haulage road shall have shelter holes at intervals not to exceed the interval permitted by the roof control plan for crosscuts. Except at a point where more than six feet of side clearance, measured from the rail, is maintained, or at a room switch, a shelter hole shall be provided at each manually operated door and at each switch throw.

Except for shelter holes at an underground slope landing where miners pass and cars are handled, each shelter hole shall have (i) a depth of at least five feet; (ii) a width of at most four feet, unless a room neck or crosscut width exceeding four feet is used as a shelter hole; and (iii) a height of at least six feet or, if the height of the traveling space is less than six feet, a height equivalent to that of the traveling space.

Every shelter hole at an underground slope landing where miners pass and cars are handled shall be at least (i) 10 feet in depth, (ii) four feet in width, and (iii) six feet in height.

Every shelter hole shall be kept free of refuse, loose roof, and other obstructions.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-71; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.137; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-749.
Refuge from moving traffic.

Upon the approach of moving traffic, any miner not engaged in haulage operations shall take refuge in a shelter hole or other place of safety.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-71; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.138; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-750.
Inspection of underground equipment.

Once per week, or more often if necessary, the mine foreman or a certified person shall inspect electrical and diesel transportation equipment to ensure its safe operating condition. Such equipment located on the surface shall be inspected once per month, or more often if necessary. Such person shall correct any defect found during the inspection. A record of such examinations shall be maintained.

History.

1966, c. 594, § 45.1-85; 1978, c. 118; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.139; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-751.
Maintenance of equipment.

Every locomotive, mine car, shuttle car, supply car, conveyor, piece of self-propelled mobile equipment, and other piece of equipment shall be maintained in a safe operating condition.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-72; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.140; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-752.
Self-propelled equipment.

Every piece of self-propelled mobile transportation or haulage equipment for use underground shall be equipped with safe seating facilities for the person operating the equipment unless it is equipped for remote control operation. Where seating facilities are provided on a piece of self-propelled mobile equipment, the person operating such equipment shall be seated before the equipment is put into motion.

Every piece of track-mounted equipment shall be equipped with proper lifting devices for the rerailing of such equipment.

An audible warning device and headlights shall be provided on each locomotive, shuttle car, or other piece of self-propelled mobile transportation or haulage equipment.

A trip light capable of being seen for at least 300 feet underground shall be used on the rear of any trip that is pulled and on the front of any pushed trip or trip that is lowered on a slope; however, a trip light need not be used if a locomotive is used on each end of a trip.

Effective measures, including use of a trailing locomotive, slides, skids, or drags, shall be taken during track haulage to ensure that safe control is maintained when a grade creates a potential hazard.

Where block signals are used, procedures to safely control traffic movement within the system shall be established in writing and posted and reviewed with all miners.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-69.1, 45-69.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-72, 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.141; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-753.
Pushing cars.

Pushing any car on a main haulage road is prohibited except (i) where it is necessary to push a car from a sidetrack that is located near the working section to the producing entry or room; (ii) where it is necessary to clear a switch or sidetrack; and (iii) on the approach to a cage, slope, or surface incline. However, where a rail transportation system is utilized and it becomes necessary to routinely push cars, the operator shall develop procedures for coordination and control of rail traffic, such as the provision of effective trip lights or other warning devices, and other safety precautions specific to the mine. Such procedures shall be subject to approval of the Chief.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.142; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-754.
Transportation of material.

Any equipment, material, or supplies being transported shall be loaded in a manner that protects the operator and other personnel from sliding equipment, material, or supplies.

Any equipment, material, or supplies that are not necessary for the operation of a piece of self-propelled mobile equipment shall not be transported on such equipment, except for when the mobile equipment is designed to carry such materials or supplies and no hazard is created. Only small hand tools and materials or supplies that do not create hazards may be transported in the same compartment of a mantrip where any miner is seated.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.143; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-755.
Securing cars.

A standing car on any track, unless it is held effectively by brakes, shall be properly blocked to prevent movement.

Positive-acting stopblocks or derails shall be used when necessary to protect miners from the hazard of runaway rail equipment. Derails shall be located where a grade at the entrance or any other location in the mine creates a potential collision hazard.

Safety chains, steel ropes, or other effective devices capable of holding the load shall be used to prevent a runaway mantrip or other supply car.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.144; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-756.
Riding on cars.

No person other than the motorman and the trip rider shall ride on a locomotive unless authorized by the mine foreman.

No person shall ride on a loaded car or between cars of any trip.

No person shall get on or off a moving locomotive or a car that is being moved by a locomotive.

No person shall be allowed to ride on top of a piece of self-propelled mobile equipment.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.145; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-757.
Back-poling.

Back-poling shall be prohibited except (i) at a place where the trolley pole cannot be reversed or (ii) when going up an extremely steep grade. In such circumstances, back-poling shall occur only at very slow speed.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.146; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-758.
Operation of equipment.

Every operator of self-propelled mobile haulage equipment shall face in the direction of travel except when the equipment is being loaded and is under the boom of the loading equipment.

Every track haulage car that requires coupling and uncoupling shall be equipped with automatic couplers or devices designed to allow coupling and uncoupling without exposing miners between such equipment. Specialty cars designed with safe clearance when connecting to other cars are excluded from the provisions of this subsection.

Every person operating self-propelled haulage equipment shall sound a warning before starting such equipment and on approaching any curve, sidetrack, door, curtain, manway crossing, or other place where a miner is or is likely to be.

All rail equipment shall be operated at speeds that are safe for the condition of any rail installation, grade, or clearance encountered. When rail equipment is being operated at a normal safe speed, a distance of 300 feet shall be maintained from the rear of other rail equipment in operation, except for a trailing locomotive that is an integral part of the trip.

All persons shall stand in the clear during any switching operation.

No two pieces of self-propelled mobile mining equipment traveling in opposite directions inside a coal mine shall be allowed to pass each other while both are in motion on the same haulage road unless a distance of at least two feet is maintained between the vehicles.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.147; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-759.
Dispatchers.

Where a dispatcher is employed to control trips at a mine, traffic under his jurisdiction shall be moved only at his direction. The dispatcher shall be stationed on the surface at the mine.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-73; 1979, c. 315; 1983, c. 70; 1985, c. 302; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.148; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-760.
Availability of mantrips.

The operator or his agent shall maintain a mantrip or other equipment suitable for providing reasonable access within a reasonable time to any area of the mine where miners are working and where transportation is ordinarily provided. The suitability of the equipment and the reasonableness of the time required to reach such an area of the mine shall be determined by the Chief.

History.

1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.149; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-761.
Mantrips.

Each mantrip that is operated by means of a locomotive shall be pulled and operated at a safe speed that is consistent with the condition of the road and the type of equipment used and shall be so controlled that it can be stopped within the limits of the operator’s visibility.

Each mantrip shall be under the charge of an authorized person and operated independently of any loaded trip.

Each mantrip shall be maintained in safe operating condition. Mantrips shall be provided in sufficient number to prevent any mantrip from becoming overloaded.

No person shall ride under a trolley wire other than in a suitably covered mantrip. A covered mantrip shall not be required under trolley wires that are guarded or positioned in accordance with subsection F of §

45.2-808

.

Other than small hand tools carried on the person, no supplies, tools, or materials shall be transported in the same car or cage with miners on any mantrip, except in a special compartment in the car designed for such purpose.

No miner shall board or leave a moving mantrip car. Each miner shall remain seated while in a moving car and shall proceed in an orderly manner to and from a mantrip.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-74; 1985, c. 296; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.150; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-762.
Mantrip loading and unloading areas.

Any area used regularly for loading or unloading mantrips shall be kept clear and free of obstructions and have ample clearance for moving equipment. Each miner shall remain in such area until the mantrip is ready to load.

Trolley and power wires shall be guarded effectively at any area where persons regularly load or unload from mantrips or cages and where there is a possibility that a person could come into contact with energized electric wiring while boarding or disembarking the mantrip or cage.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-74; 1985, c. 296; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.151; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-763.
Transporting miners by conveyor belt.

If a conveyor belt is used for transporting miners, such belt shall be free of loose materials and shall maintain a minimum clearance of at least 18 inches between the belt and the overhead roof or crossbars, projecting equipment, cap pieces, overhead cables, wiring, and other objects. Each conveyor belt that is used for transporting miners shall be equipped with emergency stop cords for its entire length.

The conveyor belt speed while miners are being transported shall not exceed (i) 250 feet per minute if the overhead clearance maintained pursuant to subsection A is more than 18 inches but less than 24 inches and (ii) 300 feet per minute if the overhead clearance is 24 inches or more. Such conveyor belt shall be stopped while miners are boarding or disembarking.

The space between miners riding on a conveyor belt line shall be at least five feet.

Adequate clearance and proper illumination shall be provided where miners board or disembark a conveyor belt.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-69.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-74; 1985, c. 296; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.152; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.